Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-9] Initiation of arbitration.
(a) A person initiates an arbitration proceeding by giving notice in a record
to the other parties to the agreement to arbitrate in the agreed manner between
the parties or, in the absence of agreement, by certified or registered mail,
return receipt requested and obtained, or by service as authorized for the
commencement of a civil action. The notice shall describe the nature of the
controversy and the remedy sought.

(b) Unless a person objects for lack or insufficiency
of notice under section 658A-15(c) before the beginning of the arbitration
hearing, by appearing at the hearing the person waives any objection to lack of
or insufficiency of notice. [L 2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Case Notes

This section is not limited to persons asserting a claim; the
plain language of this section sets forth the requirements for initiating an
arbitration proceeding by a person who is a party to an arbitration agreement.
107 H. 386, 114 P.3d 892 (2005).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next